Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a hospital licensed under this
chapter is authorized to:
(a) Establish a police department and appoint hospital police officers and other
employees for the hospital;
(b) Prescribe distinctive uniforms for the police officers of the hospital; and
(c)_ Designate and operate emergency vehicles.
(2) Police officers appointed by a hospital under Sections 1 to 7 of this Act shall take
an appropriate oath of office, in form or manner consistent with the Constitution
of Kentucky, and shall serve at the pleasure of the hospital.
(3) Sections 1 to 7 of this Act shall not apply to any hospital licensed under this
chapter that is owned or operated by a public postsecondary educational
institution or its affiliated corporations, the Commonwealth, any city, county,
charter county government, urban-county government, consolidated local
government, unified local government, or any political subdivision thereof.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Police officers appointed by a hospital under Sections 1 to 7 of this Act shall
be peace officers and conservators of the peace. They shall have general
police powers including the power to arrest, without process, all persons
who within their view commit any crime or misdemeanor. They shall
possess all of the common law and statutory powers, privileges, and
immunities of sheriffs, except that they shall be empowered to serve civil
process to the extent authorized by the hospital authorizing and employing
Page 1 of 9
BR090600.100 - 906 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 906
them.
(b) Without limiting the generality of the powers, privileges, and immunities
granted under paragraph (a) of this subsection, hospital police officers are
authorized and empowered, and it shall be their duty to:
1. Preserve the peace, maintain order, and prevent unlawful use of force
or violence or other unlawful conduct on all property owned by or
being used by the hospital, and to protect all persons and property
located thereon from injury, harm, and damage;
2. Enforce and assist officials of the hospital in the enforcement of the
lawful rules and regulations of the hospital; and
3. Assist and cooperate with law enforcement agencies and officers.
(c) Hospital police officers shall exercise the powers granted in this section:
1. Upon any real property owned or occupied by the hospital, including
the streets passing through and adjacent to that real property;
2. In any county of the Commonwealth where the hospital owns, uses, or
occupies property; and
3. In any additional jurisdiction as established by agreement with the
chief of police of the local government, sheriff of the county, or the
appropriate law enforcement agency where the property is located,
dependent upon the jurisdiction involved.
(2) Hospital police officers appointed pursuant to Sections 1 to 7 of this Act shall
have, in addition to the other powers enumerated in this section, the power to
conduct investigations anywhere in this Commonwealth if the investigation
relates to criminal offenses which occurred on property owned, leased, or
controlled by the hospital. Where desirable and at the discretion of the hospital's
police officials, the hospital's police department may coordinate said
investigations with any law enforcement agency of this Commonwealth or with
Page 2 of 9
BR090600.100 - 906 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 906
agencies of the federal government.
(3) Sections 1 to 7 of this Act shall not be construed as a diminution or modification
of the authority or responsibility of any city or county police department, the
Department of Kentucky State Police, sheriff, constable granted police powers, or
other peace officer either on the property of a hospital or otherwise.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) All persons appointed as hospital police officers pursuant to Sections 1 to 7 of
this Act shall, at the time of their employment:
(a) Be certified in accordance with KRS 15.380 to 15.404; and
(b) Possess whatever other requirements as may be set by the hospital that
employs them.
(2) The hospital may provide for the appointment or promotion to the ranks and
grades and positions of the hospital police officers and civilians as are considered
by the hospital to be necessary for the efficient administration of the hospital
police department. The hospital police officers and civilians shall receive
compensation as shall be fixed and paid by the hospital.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Vehicles used for emergency purposes by the police department of a hospital shall
be considered emergency vehicles, equipped with blue lights and sirens, and
operated in conformance with the requirements of KRS Chapter 189.
(2) Police officers directly employed by a hospital pursuant to Sections 1 to 7 of this
Act shall have the rights accorded to peace officers provided under KRS 527.020.
(3) Police departments established by hospitals may install, maintain, and operate
radio systems on police or other radio frequencies under licenses issued by the
Federal Communications Commission, or its successor, KRS 432.570 to the
Page 3 of 9
BR090600.100 - 906 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 906
contrary notwithstanding.
(4) Police departments of hospitals shall comply with the requirements of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes and the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet with regard
to reporting of criminal and other statistics.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Each hospital, having the power and authority to govern and control the
method and purpose of use of property owned or occupied by the hospital,
including travel over that property, is hereby confirmed in its authority to
regulate the traffic and parking of motor vehicles, bicycles, or other vehicles
as well as the traffic of pedestrians on, over, and across the streets, roads,
paths, and grounds of real property owned, used, or occupied by the
hospital. The regulations applicable to traffic and parking may include but
are not limited to:
1. Provisions governing the registration, speed, operation, parking, and
times, places, and manner of use of motor vehicles, bicycles, and other
vehicles;
2. Provisions prescribing penalties for the violation of those regulations,
which penalties may include the imposition of reasonable charges, the
removing and impounding, at the expense of the violator, of vehicles
that are operated or parked in violation of the regulations, and the
denial of permission to operate vehicles on the property of the
hospital; and
3. Provisions establishing reasonable charges and fees for the
registration of vehicles and for the use of parking spaces or facilities
owned or occupied by the hospital.
(b) This section shall not be deemed to limit or restrict the powers of any
Page 4 of 9
BR090600.100 - 906 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 906
governmental authority having jurisdiction over public streets, roads, alleys,
or ways.
(2) Motor vehicle moving violations of regulations issued under this section shall be
deemed violations of the appropriate equivalent sections of the motor vehicle laws
of the Commonwealth and may be prosecuted in the courts having territorial
jurisdiction over the physical location of the offense.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A person shall not falsely represent himself or herself to be a hospital police officer,
agent, or employee of a police department of a hospital and in that assumed character
arrest or detain, search, or question, in any manner the person or property of any
person, and shall not without the authority of the hospital, wear the official uniform,
insignia, badge, or identification of the hospital police department.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any complaint taken from a citizen alleging misconduct on the part of any
hospital police officer appointed pursuant to Sections 1 to 7 of this Act shall be
taken as follows:
(a) If the complaint alleges criminal activity by a hospital police officer, the
allegations may be investigated without a signed, sworn complaint of the
citizen;
(b) If the complaint alleges any other type of violation not constituting criminal
activity, including violations of law enforcement procedures or the general
employment policies of the hospital, an affidavit, signed and sworn to by the
citizen, shall be obtained, except as provided in paragraph (c) of this
subsection; or
(c) If a complaint is required to be obtained and the citizen, upon request,
Page 5 of 9
BR090600.100 - 906 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 906
refuses to make allegations under oath in the form of an affidavit, signed
and sworn to, the hospital may investigate the allegations but shall bring
charges under subsection (4) of this section against the hospital police
officer only if the hospital can independently substantiate the allegations
absent the sworn statement of the citizen.
(2) (a) When a hospital police officer is accused of an act or omission that would
constitute a violation of law enforcement procedures by any individual
within the hospital police department, including supervisors, the hospital
shall conform the conduct of any investigation to the provisions of
subsection (3) of this section, shall formally charge the hospital police
officer in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, and shall conduct a
hearing in accordance with subsection (5) of this section before any
disciplinary action shall be taken against the hospital police officer.
(b) This subsection shall not prevent the hospital from suspending the hospital
police officer, with or without pay, during an investigation and pending the
final disposition of any formal charges, except that a hospital police officer
suspended without pay shall be entitled to full back pay and benefits for the
regular hours he or she would have worked if no formal charges are
brought or the hearing authority finds the officer not guilty of the charges.
(c) A hospital shall not be required to follow the provisions of this section in
addressing conduct by the hospital police officer that would constitute a
violation of the general employment policies of the hospital.
(3) Any complaint filed by a citizen under subsection (1) of this section, or any
allegation of conduct that would constitute a violation of law enforcement
procedures under subsection (2) of this section, shall be investigated by the
hospital in accordance with this section if the hospital determines that an
investigation of the complaint or the alleged conduct is warranted.
Page 6 of 9
BR090600.100 - 906 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 906
(4) (a) If it is determined through investigation or other means that the facts
alleged in a citizen complaint or in an accusation of a violation of law
enforcement procedures warrant charging the hospital police officer, the
charge shall be made in writing with sufficient specificity so as to fully
inform the hospital police officer of the nature and circumstances of the
alleged violation in order that he or she may be able to properly defend
himself or herself.
(b) The charge shall be signed by a representative of the hospital, shall set out
the disciplinary action recommended or imposed, and shall be served on the
officer in writing by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal
delivery.
(5) Unless waived by the charged hospital police officer in writing, a hearing shall be
conducted by the hospital to determine whether there is substantial evidence to
prove the charges and to determine what, if any, disciplinary action shall be taken
if substantial evidence does exist. In conducting a hearing, the following
administrative due process rights shall be recognized and these shall be the
minimum rights afforded any hospital police officer charged, except as otherwise
agreed to in writing by the officer and the hospital:
(a) The accused hospital police officer shall be given at least twelve (12) days'
written notice of any hearing. The notice of hearing shall be served on the
hospital police officer by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by
personal delivery;
(b) Copies of any sworn statements or affidavits to be considered by the hearing
authority and any exculpatory statements or affidavits shall be furnished to
the hospital police officer no less than twelve (12) days prior to the time of
any hearing;
(c) At any hearing based upon the sworn complaint of a citizen, the citizen
Page 7 of 9
BR090600.100 - 906 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 906
shall be notified to appear at the time and place of the hearing by certified
mail, return receipt requested, or by personal delivery;
(d) If the return receipt has been returned unsigned, or the citizen does not
appear, except due to circumstances beyond his or her control preventing
the citizen from appearing at the time and place of the hearing, any charge
resulting from a complaint made by that citizen shall not be considered by
the hearing authority and shall be dismissed with prejudice;
(e) The accused hospital police officer shall have the right and opportunity to
obtain and have counsel present, and to be represented by counsel;
(f) The accused hospital police officer shall be allowed to present witnesses and
any documentary or other relevant evidence the officer wishes to provide to
the hearing authority, and may cross-examine all witnesses called by the
charging party;
(g) If any hospital police officer who has been suspended with or without pay is
not given a hearing as provided by this section within seventy-five (75) days
of any charge being filed pursuant to this section, the charge shall be
dismissed with prejudice and shall not be considered by any hearing
authority and the hospital police officer shall be reinstated with full back
pay and benefits;
(h) Any hospital police officer who has been suspended without pay who is
found not guilty of the charges by the hearing authority shall be reinstated
with the full back pay and benefits for the regular hours he or she would
have worked; and
(i) The failure to provide any of the rights or to follow the provisions of this
section may be raised by the hospital police officer with the hearing
authority. The hearing authority shall not exclude proffered evidence based
on failure to follow the requirements of this section but shall consider
Page 8 of 9
BR090600.100 - 906 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 906
whether, because of the failure, the proffered evidence lacks weight or
credibility and whether the hospital police officer has been materially
prejudiced.
Page 9 of 9
BR090600.100 - 906 - XXXX 3/13/2026 9:55 AM Jacketed